DI-498

DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

DI3QL-01

DTC

B0131/64

Open in P/T Squib (RH) Circuit

CIRCU

The P/T squib circuit (RH) consists of the airbag sensor assembly and seat belt pretensioner (RH).

IT DESCRIPTION

It causes the seat belt pretensioner (RH) to activate when the seat belt pretensioner (RH) activation condi-

tions are

satisfied.

For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS-2.
DTC B0131/64 is recorded when an open is detected in the P/T squib (RH) circuit.

* P/T squib (RH) malfunction

* Airbag sensor assembly malfunction

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
¢ Open circuit in PR+ wire harness or PR- wire harness of .
squib « Seat belt pretensioner (RH)
B0131/64 ; ¢ Airbag sensor assembly

*Wire harness

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI-493.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

Prepare for inspection. (See step 1 on page DI-549)

-

H05166
H02141

H06828

@

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)

Resistance: Below 1 Q

2 [ Check P/T squib (RH) circuit.
CHECK:
P/T Squib (RH) _ For the connector (gn the seat belt pretfansioner side) between
é‘rbag the seatbelt pretensioner (RH) and the airbag sensor assem-
{iﬂ %im:[l :I Aensor bly, measurethe resistance between PR+ and PR -
ssembly OK:

NG> Go to step 5.
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3 | Check airbag sensor assembly.

P/T Squib (RH)

—f ]

Airbag
Sensor

Assembly

PR- PR

H05167 H02139
AB0118 AB0119
R13006 HO01083

+ ACC ON
DD

Check Connector DTC B0131/64

H06829

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)

PREPARATION:

(@)
(b)

(©)

Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
Using a service wire, connect PR+ and PR- of the con-
nector (on the seat belt pretensioner side) between the
seat belt pretensioner (RH) and the airbag sensor assem-
bly.

Connect negative (-) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

OK:

HINT:

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See page DI-447)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-
conds.

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Check DTC.

(See page DI-447)

DTCBO 131/64is notoutput.

CodesotherthancodeB0O 131/64 may be output atthistime, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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4 | Check P/T squib (RH).

P/T Squib (RH) Aitbag

{ [D lr‘_-D :| Sensor

Assembly

ACC ON

@,

Check Connector DTC B0131/64

H05168

AB0118AB0119
R13006 H01083 H06830

PREPARATION:

(@)
(b)

(©
(d)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK.

Disconnect negative (-) terminal cable from the battery,
and wait at least for 90 seconds.

Connect the seat belt pretensioner (RH) connector.
Connect negative (-) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

OK:

HINT:

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See page DI-447)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-
conds.

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Check DTC.

(See page DI-447)

DTCBO0 131/64 is notoutput.

CodesotherthancodeB0O 131/64 may be output atthistime, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace seat belt pretensioner (RH).

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)
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5 Check floor wire harness.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the floor wire harness connector on the airbag sen-

Airbag sorassembly side.
] @éﬂ =1 [Jsensor CHECK:

Floor Wire Harness

, - — Assembly _ _
P/T Squib (RH) For the connector (on the floor wire harness side) between the
% seat belt pretensioner and the floor wire harness, measure the
resistance betweenPR+andPR -.
OK:

Resistance:Below 1 Q

H05169
HO2141 H06831

NG% pair orreplace floor wire harness.

OK

6 | Check harness between airbag sensor assembly and floor wire harness.

_ CHECK:
Floor Wire Harness For the connector (on the airbag sensor assembly side) be-
, A Airbag tweenthe airbag sensor assembly and the floor wire harness,
= [ B ]igggronrbly measuretheresistance betweenPR+andPR  -.
P/T Squib (RH) OK:
% Resistance: Below 1 Q

tween airbag sensor assembly and floor wire
harness.

H05170
H02141 H06832

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector be-

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM6 16E)



